Alabama, session 2026rs, HB619.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
55 Section 1. Sections 34-36-3, 34-36-4, and 34-36-12,
56 Code of Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
Page 2

Code of Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
HB619 INTRODUCED
57 "§34-36-3
58 TheFor the purposes of this chapter, the following
59 terms shall have the following meanings respectively ascribed
60 to them used in this chapter, for the purposes of this
61 chapter, unless the context clearly requires a different
62 meaning:
63 (1) BOARD. The Alabama Board of Electrical Contractors.
64 (2) COMPLIANCE OFFICER. An employee of the board who,
65 based upon a complaint, conducts the necessary activities to
66 determine the validity of the complaint and the extent to
67 which a violation of the codes and standards adopted by the
68 board has occurred.
69 (3) DIRECTOR. The Executive Director of the Alabama
70 Board of Electrical Contractors.
71 (3)(4) ELECTRICAL CONTRACTING. Any job or project in
72 the State of Alabama wherein the electrical contractor
73 proposes to bid, install, maintain, alter, or repair any
74 electric wiring devices or equipment.
75 (4)(5) ELECTRICAL CONTRACTOR. Any person, firm, or
76 corporation who is engaged in the business of soliciting and
77 installing electrical power or control systems; and
78 maintaining, altering, or repairing electrical power or
79 control systems, any electrical wiring devices, equipment, or
80 any other electrical apparatus. A person who possesses the
81 necessary qualifications, training, and technical knowledge to
82 plan, lay out, and supervise the installation of electrical
83 wiring, apparatus, or equipment for lighting, heating, power,
84 or controls and who possesses any of the following
Page 3

or controls and who possesses any of the following
HB619 INTRODUCED
85 qualifications:
86 a. Four years of practical experience as a journeyman
87 electrician in charge of jobs.
88 b. Four years of experience in the design and
89 construction of electrical systems.
90 (6) ELECTRICAL INSPECTOR. A person hired to perform
91 electrical code compliance observations throughout the
92 installation, replacement, or repair of any electrical system
93 or component.
94 (5)(7) JOURNEYMAN ELECTRICIAN. A person who possesses
95 necessary qualifications, training, and technical knowledge to
96 install electrical wiring, apparatus, or equipment lighting,
97 heating, or power or control covered by this chapter. He or
98 she shall work under a master or state
99 certifiedstate-certified electrical contractor and shall be
100 capable of doing work according to plans and specifications
101 furnished to him or her and in accordance with standard rules
102 and regulations governing such work.
103 (6)(8) LICENSE. A valid and current certificate of
104 registration issued by the director on behalf of the board
105 which shall give the named person to whom it is issued
106 authority to engage in the activity prescribed thereon.
107 (7)(9) LICENSEE. Any person holding a license.
108 (8)(10) PERSON. A human person, not a legal entity."
109 "§34-36-4
110 (a) The Alabama Board of Electrical Contractors is
111 created.
112 (b) A person to be eligible for appointment to serve on
Page 4

(b) A person to be eligible for appointment to serve on
HB619 INTRODUCED
113 the board shall be a citizen and resident of Alabama to be
114 eligible to serve on the board. Each person appointed to the
115 board from each congressional district shall be actively
116 engaged in the electrical construction business as a qualified
117 person with electrical construction background of not less
118 than five consecutive years, and shall hold certificates to
119 validate his or her competence as an electrical contractor in
120 the electrical construction field. The two persons appointed
121 to the board as at-large members shall be members of the
122 Alabama State Electrical Workers Association. The appointing
123 authorities shall coordinate their appointments to assure the
124 board membership of the board should beis inclusive and should
125 reflectreflects the racial, gender, geographic,
126 urban/rural,urban, rural, and economic diversity of the state.
127 (c) The board shall consist of nine members to be
128 appointed by the Governor. One member shall be appointed from
129 each congressional district, and there shall be two at-large
130 members who shall be appointed from within the state. The
131 board members from the First, Second, and Third Congressional
132 Districts shall be appointed for terms of one year; the board
133 members from the Fourth, Fifth, and Sixth Congressional
134 Districts shall be appointed for terms of two years; and the
135 board member from the Seventh Congressional District as well
136 as the at-large members shall be appointed for terms of three
137 years. Thereafter, all board members shall be appointed for
138 terms of three years. Each term shall expire on June 30 of the
139 last year of the term, and no member shall serve more than two
140 consecutive three-year terms. Vacancies on the board for any
Page 5

consecutive three-year terms. Vacancies on the board for any
HB619 INTRODUCED
141 cause shall be filled by appointment by the Governor for the
142 remainder of the unexpired term. Members shall serve until
143 their successors are appointed.
144 (d) The board shall meet at least semiannually and as
145 often as necessary. The board shall meet annually to elect
146 officers from its membership, whose initial terms shall expire
147 on June 30 next following their election. Special meetings of
148 the board may be held as the board provides in its rules and
149 regulations. The board shall meet at least once in the first
150 quarter and once in the third quarter of the year. Five
151 members of the board shall constitute a quorum.
152 (e) The board may adopt rules and regulations to carry
153 out this chapter.
154 (f) Any member of the board or duly appointed hearing
155 officer designated by the board may administer oaths and take
156 testimony concerning all matters within the jurisdiction of
157 the board.
158 (g) The board may sue and be sued in its official name.
159 Absent negligence, wantonness, recklessness, or deliberate
160 misconduct, members of the board are immune from liability for
161 all good faith acts performed in the execution of their duties
162 of the board.
163 (h) The board shall adopt a seal for its use containing
164 the words: Alabama Electrical Contractors' Licensing
165 BoardAlabama Board of Electrical Contractors.
166 (i) The board may employ, and at its pleasure
167 discharge, an executive director. The board may hire other
168 officers and administrative employees which may beas necessary
Page 6

officers and administrative employees which may beas necessary
HB619 INTRODUCED
169 to implement this chapter. The board may employ, on an as
170 needed basis, an investigator to investigate compliance
171 officers to conduct investigations based on consumer
172 complaints against a licensee. The board shall not employ
173 electrical inspectors nor provide for any electrical
174 inspections. The board shall outline the duties and fix the
175 compensation and expense allowances of all employees pursuant
176 to the Merit System Act of Alabama.
177 (j) The board is subject to the Alabama Sunset Law and
178 is classified as an enumerated agency pursuant to Section
179 41-20-3. The board shall automatically terminate on October 1,
180 2012, and every four years thereafter, unless a bill is
181 enacted that the board be continued, modified, or
182 reestablished.
183 (k) Each board member shall be accountable to the
184 Governor for the proper performance of his or her duties as a
185 member of the board. The Governor shall investigate any
186 complaints or unfavorable reports concerning the actions of
187 the board and shall take appropriate action thereon, including
188 removal of any board member for misfeasance, malfeasance,
189 neglect of duty, commission of a felony, incompetence, or
190 permanent inability to perform official duties. A board member
191 may be removed at the request of the board after failing to
192 attend three consecutive properly noticed meetings."
193 "§34-36-12
194 Every person holding a license issued by the board
195 shall display it in a conspicuous manner at his or her
196 principal place of business.Every electrical contractor
Page 7

principal place of business.Every electrical contractor
HB619 INTRODUCED
197 licensed under this chapter shall display the contractor's
198 certification number and the company name on all
199 documentation, forms of advertising, and on all service and
200 installation vehicles used in conjunction with electrical
201 contracting."
202 Section 2. Section 34-36-19 is added to the Code of
203 Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
204 §34-36-19
205 The board may adopt and publish minimum installation,
206 repair, and service standards for its licensees, and shall
207 publish the standards to every licensee at least 30 days
208 before the standard becomes effective. Licensees who fail to
209 comply with the minimum standards shall be disciplined as
210 provided under Section 34-36-6. A licensee who is working in a
211 jurisdiction that has adopted and is enforcing an electrical
212 code through its permitting and inspection processes shall be
213 held to the standards adopted and enforced by the local
214 jurisdiction.
215 Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
216 1, 2026.
Page 8